Nebraska, session 109, LB1088.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1088 LB1088
2026 2026
Section 1. (1) For purposes of this section:
(a) Firearm has the same meaning as in section 28-1201;
(b) Misdemeanor crime of domestic violence has the same meaning as
in section 28-1206;
(c) Qualified third party means:
(i) A county sheriff, police officer, or member of the Nebraska
State Patrol;
(ii) A firearm dealer licensed pursuant to 18 U.S.C. 923; or
(iii) Any other responsible adult named by a court in an order under
this section; and
(d) Respondent means the person subject to an order under this
section.
(2) A court shall enter an order requiring a person to surrender all
firearms and ammunition in his or her possession when:
(a) Issuing a domestic abuse protection order as provided in section
26-115;
(b) Sentencing a defendant to a misdemeanor crime of domestic
violence as provided in section 10 of this act;
(c) Sentencing a defendant for a misdemeanor violation of a domestic
abuse protection order or foreign domestic abuse protection order as
provided in section 26-118; or
(d) Issuing an order relating to a foreign domestic abuse protection
order as provided in section 9 of this act.
(3) An order under this section shall:
(a) Require the respondent, within the deadline required by
subsection (4) of this section, to:
(i) Surrender all firearms or ammunition in the respondent's
possession in this state to a qualified third party; and
(ii) Complete the affidavit under subsection (6) of this section and
deliver it to the sheriff, county attorney, the designee of the sheriff
or county attorney, or any person named by the court in the order;
-2-

LB1088 LB1088
2026 2026
(b) Order the respondent not to possess any firearms or ammunition
for the period of time provided in subsection (5) of this section;
(c) Notify the respondent that the respondent may be responsible for
paying any costs of storing such firearms or ammunition;
(d) Notify the respondent that following the expiration of the
period of time provided for in subsection (5) of this section, the
respondent may reclaim possession of such firearms or ammunition, unless
otherwise prohibited by law from possessing such firearms or ammunition
at that time; and
(e) Notify the respondent of the penalty for violating this section
or section 28-1206.
(4)(a) Except as provided in subdivision (4)(b) of this section, the
respondent shall surrender all firearms and ammunition in the
respondent's possession in this state to a qualified third party and
complete and return the affidavit under subsection (6) of this section
within forty-eight hours after receipt of the order under subsection (3)
of this section.
(b) For a respondent who is convicted of a misdemeanor crime of
domestic violence and sentenced to a period of incarceration, the
deadline in this subsection shall be forty-eight hours after release from
incarceration, unless an earlier period is agreed to in writing by the
respondent and the court, in which case a responsible person designated
by the incarcerated respondent may surrender the respondent's firearms
and ammunition and complete the affidavit on the respondent's behalf.
(5) An order issued under this section shall remain in effect:
(a) For an order arising from any protection order, so long as such
protection order is in effect, including any renewals; and
(b) For an order arising from a conviction for a misdemeanor crime
of domestic violence, for a period of seven years following such
conviction.
(6) The State Court Administrator shall develop a standard affidavit
-3-

LB1088 LB1088
2026 2026
form for use under this section. The administrator shall develop such
form in consultation with advocacy groups dedicated to ending sexual and
domestic violence. The administrator shall make the form available on a
judicial branch website accessible to the public.
(7) Prior to release from incarceration for a misdemeanor crime of
domestic violence, a county jail or prison shall provide a respondent
with written notice of his or her obligations under this section.
(8) Upon issuance of an order under this section, the court shall
transmit a copy of such order to the sheriff and any other local law
enforcement agency in the county where the respondent resides and to the
Federal Bureau of Investigation's National Instant Criminal Background
Check System.
(9) A law enforcement agency that takes possession of firearms or
ammunition under this section shall:
(a) Maintain such firearms and ammunition in a secure location;
(b) Develop procedures for returning such firearms and ammunition to
a respondent following expiration of the period described in subsection
(5) of this section; and
(c) Verify that a respondent may lawfully possess any such firearms
or ammunition before returning them to the respondent.
(10) A respondent who fails to comply with an order issued under
this section shall be guilty of a Class I misdemeanor.
Sec. 2. Section 26-101, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
26-101 Sections 26-101 to 26-125 and section 9 of this act shall be
known and may be cited as the Protection Orders Act.
Sec. 3. Section 26-106, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
26-106 (1) A petition for a protection order or for an order under
section 9 of this act shall be filed with the clerk of the district
court, and the proceeding may be heard by the county court or the
-4-

LB1088 LB1088
2026 2026
district court as provided in section 25-2740.
(2) A petition for a protection order may not be withdrawn except
upon order of the court.
Sec. 4. Section 26-112, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
26-112 During any hearing on a protection order or under section 9
of this act, the petition and affidavit shall be deemed to have been
offered into evidence, and they shall be admitted into evidence unless
specifically excluded by the court.
Sec. 5. Section 26-115, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
26-115 Upon issuance of any domestic abuse protection order, the
court shall:
(1) Cause cause the notice created under section 29-2291 to be
served upon the respondent notifying the respondent that it may be
unlawful under federal law for a person who is subject to a domestic
abuse protection order to possess or receive any firearm or ammunition;
and .
(2) Issue an order requiring the defendant to surrender all firearms
and ammunition as required by section 1 of this act.
Sec. 6. Section 26-116, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
26-116 (1) Fees to cover costs associated with the filing of a
petition for a protection order, the filing of a petition under section 9
of this act, or the issuance or service of a protection order seeking
only the relief provided by the Protection Orders Act shall not be
charged, except that a court may assess such fees and costs if the court
finds, by clear and convincing evidence, that the statements contained in
the petition were false and that the protection order was sought in bad
faith.
(2) At the final hearing, a court may assess costs associated with
-5-

LB1088 LB1088
2026 2026
the filing of a petition for a protection order or the issuance or
service of a protection order seeking only the relief provided by the
Protection Orders Act against the respondent.
Sec. 7. Section 26-118, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
26-118 (1) Any person, except the petitioner, who knowingly violates
a protection order issued pursuant to the Protection Orders Act, after
service or notice as described in subsection (4) of section 26-114, or a
valid foreign protection order recognized pursuant to section 26-123 or
26-124, shall be guilty of an offense and punished as provided in this
section.
(2)(a) (2) For a violation involving a domestic abuse protection
order, a sexual assault protection order, a valid foreign domestic abuse
protection order recognized pursuant to section 26-123, or a valid
foreign sexual assault protection order recognized pursuant to section
26-124, a violation of this section is a Class I misdemeanor for a first
offense and a Class IV felony for any second or subsequent offense.
(b) When sentencing a defendant for a misdemeanor violation of this
subsection involving a domestic abuse protection order or a foreign
domestic abuse protection order, the court shall enter an order requiring
the defendant to surrender all firearms and ammunition as required by
section 1 of this act.
(3) For a violation of a harassment protection order or a valid
foreign harassment protection order recognized pursuant to section
26-124, a violation of this section is a Class II misdemeanor for a first
offense and a Class I misdemeanor for any second or subsequent offense.
Sec. 8. Section 26-121, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
26-121 (1) The clerk of the district court shall make available
standard petition and affidavit forms for all types of protection orders
provided by law and petition and affidavit forms for proceedings under
-6-

LB1088 LB1088
2026 2026
section 9 of this act. Such petitions and affidavit forms shall include
with instructions for completion to be used by a petitioner.
(2) Affidavit forms for protection orders shall request all relevant
information, including, but not limited to: A description of the most
recent incident that was the basis for the application for a protection
order and the date or approximate date of the incident and, if there was
more than one incident, the most severe incident and the date or
approximate date of such incident. The affidavit form shall permit the
petitioner to request that any contact information of the petitioner be
kept confidential. If the petitioner makes such request, such information
shall not be released and shall only be available for the court's use.
(3) The State Court Administrator shall adopt and promulgate the
standard petition and affidavit forms provided for in this section as
well as the standard temporary ex parte and final protection order forms
and provide a copy of such forms to all clerks of the district courts in
this state. These standard forms shall be the only such forms used in
this state.
Sec. 9. (1) For purposes of this section:
(a) Foreign domestic abuse protection order means a valid foreign
domestic abuse protection order recognized pursuant to section 26-123;
and
(b) Foreign respondent means a person subject to a foreign domestic
abuse protection order.
(2) An individual in Nebraska who is protected by a foreign domestic
abuse protection order, a peace officer, or a county attorney may file a
petition and affidavit with the clerk of the district court requesting
the court to enter an order requiring a foreign respondent to surrender
any firearms or ammunition in the foreign respondent's possession in this
state.
(3) The court shall immediately schedule an evidentiary hearing to
be held within fourteen days after the filing of the petition, and the
-7-

LB1088 LB1088
2026 2026
court shall cause notice of the petition to be given to the foreign
respondent stating that the respondent may show cause why such order
should not be entered.
(4) The court shall grant the petition if the court finds that:
(a) The foreign respondent is subject to a foreign domestic abuse
protection order;
(b) An individual protected by such order is in Nebraska; and
(c) The foreign respondent is in Nebraska.
(5) If the court grants a petition under this section, the court
shall:
(a) Provide the foreign respondent with the written notice required
by section 1 of this act; and
(b) Issue an order requiring the foreign respondent to surrender all
firearms and ammunition possessed in Nebraska as required by section 1 of
this act.
Sec. 10. When sentencing a person convicted of a misdemeanor crime
of domestic violence as defined in section 28-1206, the court shall issue
an order requiring the defendant to surrender all firearms and ammunition
as required by section 1 of this act.
Sec. 11. Original sections 26-101, 26-106, 26-112, 26-115, 26-116,
26-118, and 26-121, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, are repealed.
-8-